Nevada, session 83, SB191.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-3, 3.5, 4, 4.3, 4.7, 5, 5.3, 5.7 and 6. (Deleted by
amendment.)
Sec. 7. NRS 656.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
656.150 1. Each applicant for a certificate must file an
application with the Executive Secretary of the Board at least 30
days before the date fixed for examination. The application must be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
accompanied by the required fee and all information required to
complete the application.
2. No certificate may be issued until the applicant has:
(a) Passed the examination prescribed by the Board;
(b) Passed one of the examinations described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of NRS 656.170; and
(c) Paid the fee [as provided in] prescribed by the Board
pursuant to NRS 656.220.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. NRS 656.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
656.170 1. Examinations must be held not less than twice a
year at such times and places as the Board may designate.
2. No natural person may be admitted to the examination
unless the natural person first applies to the Board as required by
NRS 656.150. The application must include, without limitation,
satisfactory evidence to the Board that the applicant has, at the time
of filing his or her application:
(a) Satisfied the requirements set forth in subsections 1 to 4,
inclusive, of NRS 656.180;
(b) Received a passing grade on:
(1) The National Court Reporters Association’s examination
for registered professional reporters; or
(2) The National Verbatim Reporters Association’s
examination for certified verbatim reporters;
(c) Received one of the following:
(1) A certificate as a registered professional reporter issued
to the applicant by the National Court Reporters Association;
(2) A certificate as a registered merit reporter issued to the
applicant by the National Court Reporters Association;
(3) A certificate as a certified verbatim reporter issued to the
applicant by the National Verbatim Reporters Association; or
(4) A valid certificate or license to practice court reporting
issued to the applicant by another state if the requirements for
certification or licensure in that state are substantially equivalent to
the requirements of this State for obtaining a certificate;
(d) Either:
(1) At least 1 year of continuous experience within the 5
years immediately preceding the application, in the practice of court
reporting or producing verbatim records of meetings and
conferences by the use of voice writing or any system of manual or
mechanical shorthand writing and transcribing those records; or
(2) Obtained in the 12 months immediately preceding the
application, a certificate of satisfactory completion of a prescribed
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
course of study from a court reporting program that, as determined
by the Board, evidences a proficiency substantially equivalent to
subparagraph (1); and
(e) Paid the fee for filing an application for an examination [set
forth in] prescribed by the Board pursuant to NRS 656.220.
3. As used in this section, “practice of court reporting” includes
reporting by use of voice writing or any system of manual or
mechanical shorthand writing, regardless of the state in which the
reporting took place.
Secs. 10, 11, 11.1 and 11.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.5. NRS 656.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
656.200 1. To renew a certificate of registration a certified
court reporter must:
(a) Apply to the Board for renewal;
(b) Pay the annual renewal fee prescribed by the Board;
(c) Submit evidence to the Board of completion of the
requirements for continuing education established by the Board; and
(d) Submit all information required to complete the renewal.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations requiring certified court
reporters to participate in continuing education or training as a
prerequisite to the renewal or restoration of a certificate. If a
certified court reporter fails to comply with the requirements, the
Board may suspend or revoke his or her certificate.
3. The failure of any certified court reporter to submit all
information required to complete the renewal or pay in advance the
annual renewal fee which may be fixed by the Board as necessary to
defray the expense of administering the provisions of this chapter
results in the suspension of the reporter’s right to engage in the
practice of court reporting. The suspension must not be terminated
until all required information has been submitted and all delinquent
fees have been paid.
4. A certified court reporter whose certificate of registration
has been suspended because of failure to submit all required
information or pay the renewal fee:
(a) May within 2 years thereafter have the certificate reinstated
without examination upon submission of all required information
and payment of the fees [set forth in] prescribed by the Board
pursuant to paragraph [(e)] (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 656.220.
(b) While he or she was on active military duty or in training
before induction, may have the certificate renewed without payment
of any fee if he or she files an application for renewal, an
affidavit of such service with the Board within 2 years after the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
termination of the service and all information required to complete
the renewal.
Sec. 11.7. NRS 656.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
656.220 1. The Board shall, in accordance with subsection
3, prescribe by regulation reasonable initial fees [required by this
chapter are fixed by] for the following : [schedule:]
(a) The fee for filing an application for an examination . [must
be fixed by the Board annually at not more than $250 and not less
than $90.]
(b) The fee for the original issuance of a certificate . [must be
fixed by the Board annually at not more than $250 and not less than
$150.]
(c) [For a certificate issued after July 1, 1973, the fee is an
amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal
date before the date on which the certificate is issued, except that if
the certificate will expire less than 1 year after its issuance, then the
fee is 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular
renewal date before the date on which the certificate is issued. The
Board may by regulation provide for the waiver or refund of the
initial certificate fee if the certificate is issued less than 45 days
before the date on which it will expire.
(d)] The annual renewal fee for a certificate . [must be fixed by
the Board annually at not more than $250 and not less than $150.]
Every holder of a certificate desiring renewal must pay the annual
renewal fee to the Board on or before May 15 of each year.
[(e) For]
(d) The fee for the renewal of a certificate which was suspended
for failure to renew, [the fee is] which must be an amount equal to
all unpaid renewal fees accrued plus a reinstatement fee . [that must
be fixed by the Board annually at not more than $125 and not less
than $75.
(f)] (e) The fee for the original issuance of a license as a court
reporting firm . [is $250.
(g)] (f) The fee for the annual renewal of a license as a court
reporting firm . [is $175.
(h)] (g) The fee for the reinstatement of a license as a court
reporting firm . [is $175.]
2. In addition to the fees set forth in subsection 1, the Board
may charge and collect a fee for the expedited processing of a
request or for any other incidental service it provides. The fee must
not exceed the cost incurred by the Board to provide the service.
3. The initial fees prescribed by the Board pursuant to
subsection 1 must be equal to the fees established in this section or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
prescribed by regulation, as applicable, as such fees existed on
December 31, 2025.
4. After the Board prescribes the initial fees pursuant to
subsection 1, the Board may by regulation increase or decrease a
fee to an amount that is not less than 90 percent and not more
than 125 percent of the current fee.
Secs. 11.9, 12, 12.1, 12.2, 12.3, 12.4, 12.5, 12.6 and 13-15.
(Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. NRS 3.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
3.370 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, for his
or her services the official reporter or reporter pro tempore is
entitled to the following compensation:
(a) For being available to report civil and criminal testimony and
proceedings when the court is sitting during traditional business
hours on any day except Saturday or Sunday, [$250] $395 per day,
to be paid by the county as provided in subsection 4.
(b) For being available to report civil and criminal testimony
and proceedings when the court is sitting beyond traditional
business hours or on Saturday or Sunday:
(1) If the reporter has been available to report for at least 4
hours, [$35] $75 per hour for each hour of availability; or
(2) If the reporter has been available to report for fewer than
4 hours, a pro rata amount based on the daily rate set forth in
paragraph (a),
 to be paid by the county as provided in subsection 4.
(c) For transcription:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2), for the
original draft and any copy to be delivered:
(I) Within 24 hours after it is requested, [$8.03] $10 per
page for the original draft and one copy, and [$3.62] $3.75 per page
for each additional copy;
(II) Within 48 hours after it is requested, [$6.01] $8 per
page for the original draft and one copy, and [$2.72] $2.80 per page
for each additional copy;
(III) Within 4 days after it is requested, [$5.01] $7 per
page for the original draft and one copy, and [$2.26] $2.30 per page
for each additional copy; or
(IV) More than 4 days after it is requested, [$3.80] $5.50
per page for the original draft and one copy, and [$1.00] $1.50 per
page for each additional copy.
(2) For civil litigants who are ordering the original draft and
are represented by a nonprofit legal corporation or a program for pro
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
bono legal assistance, for the original draft and any copy to be
delivered:
(I) Within 24 hours after it is requested, [$5.50] $7 per
page and $1.10 per page for each additional copy;
(II) Within 48 hours after it is requested, [$4.13] $5 per
page and [83 cents] $1 per page for each additional copy;
(III) Within 4 days after it is requested, [$3.44] $4 per
page and [69 cents] $1 per page for each additional copy; or
(IV) More than 4 days after it is requested, [$2.75] $3.50
per page and [55 cents] $1 per page for each additional copy.
(3) For any party other than the party ordering the original
draft, for the copy of the draft to be delivered:
(I) Within 24 hours after it is requested, [$1.10] $1.50 per
page;
(II) Within 48 hours after it is requested, [83 cents] $1 per
page;
(III) Within 4 days after it is requested, [69 cents] $1 per
page; or
(IV) More than 4 days after it is requested, [55 cents] $1
per page.
(d) For reporting all civil matters, in addition to the
compensation provided in paragraphs (a) and (b), $40 for each hour
or fraction thereof actually spent, to be taxed as costs pursuant to
subsection 5.
(e) For providing an instantaneous translation of testimony into
English which appears on a computer that is located at a table in the
courtroom where the attorney who requested the translation is
seated:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, in all
criminal matters in which a party requests such a translation, in
addition to the compensation provided pursuant to paragraphs (a)
and (b), [$140] $300 for the first day and [$90] $200 per day for
each subsequent day from the party who makes the request. This
additional compensation must be paid by the county as provided
pursuant to subsection 4 only if the court issues an order granting
the translation service to the prosecuting attorney or to an indigent
defendant who is represented by a county or state public defender.
(2) In all civil matters in which a party requests such a
translation, in addition to the compensation provided pursuant to
paragraphs (a), (b) and (d), [$140] $300 for the first day and [$90]
$200 per day for each subsequent day, to be paid by the party who
requests the translation.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(f) For providing a diskette containing testimony prepared from
a translation provided pursuant to paragraph (e):
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, in all
criminal matters in which a party requests the diskette and the
reporter agrees to provide the diskette, in addition to the
compensation provided pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (e),
$1.50 per page of the translation contained on the diskette from the
party who makes the request. This additional compensation must be
paid by the county as provided pursuant to subsection 4 only if the
court issues an order granting the diskette to the prosecuting
attorney or to an indigent defendant who is represented by a county
or state public defender.
(2) In all civil matters in which a party requests the diskette
and the reporter agrees to provide the diskette, in addition to the
compensation provided pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b), (d) and (e),
$1.50 per page of the translation contained on the diskette, to be
paid by the party who requests the diskette.
2. For the purposes of subsection 1, a page is a sheet of paper 8
1/2 by 11 inches and does not include a condensed transcript. The
left margin must not be more than 1 [1/2] 3/4 inches from the left
edge of the paper. The right margin must not be more than three-
fourths of an inch from the right edge of the paper. Each sheet must
be numbered on the left margin and must contain at least [24] 25
lines of type. The first line of each question and of each answer may
be indented not more than five spaces from the left margin. The first
line of any paragraph or other material may be indented not more
than 10 spaces from the left margin. There must not be more than
one space between words or more than two spaces between
sentences. The type size must [not] be [larger] at least 9 characters
per inch and not more than 10 characters per inch. The lines of type
may be double spaced or one and one-half spaced.
3. If the court determines that the services of more than one
reporter are necessary to deliver transcripts on a daily basis in a
criminal proceeding, each reporter is entitled to receive:
(a) The compensation set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
subsection 1 and subparagraph (1) of paragraph (e) of subsection 1,
as appropriate; and
(b) Compensation of [$7.50] $10 per page for the original draft
and one copy, and [$2] $3 per page for each additional copy for
transcribing a proceeding of which the transcripts are ordered by the
court to be delivered on or before the start of the next day the court
is scheduled to conduct business.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
4. The compensation specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
subsection 1, the compensation for transcripts in criminal cases
ordered by the court to be made, the compensation for transcripts in
civil cases ordered by the court pursuant to NRS 12.015, the
compensation for transcripts for parents or guardians or attorneys of
parents or guardians who receive transcripts pursuant to NRS
432B.459, the compensation in criminal cases that is ordered by the
court pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (e) and
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (f) of subsection 1 and the
compensation specified in subsection 3 must be paid out of the
county treasury upon the order of the court. When there is no
official reporter in attendance and a reporter pro tempore is
appointed, his or her reasonable expenses for traveling and detention
must be fixed and allowed by the court and paid in the same
manner. The respective district judges may, with the approval of the
respective board or boards of county commissioners within the
judicial district, fix a monthly salary to be paid to the official
reporter in lieu of per diem. The salary, and also actual traveling
expenses in cases where the reporter acts in more than one county,
must be prorated by the judge on the basis of time consumed by
work in the respective counties and must be paid out of the
respective county treasuries upon the order of the court.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, in civil cases,
the compensation prescribed in paragraph (d) of subsection 1 and
for transcripts ordered by the court to be made must be paid by the
parties in equal proportions, and either party may, at the party’s
option, pay the entire compensation. In either case, all amounts so
paid by the party to whom costs are awarded must be taxed as costs
in the case. The compensation for transcripts and copies ordered by
the parties must be paid by the party ordering them. No reporter may
be required to perform any service in a civil case until his or her
compensation has been paid to him or her.
6. Where a transcript is ordered by the court or by any party,
the compensation for the transcript must be paid to the reporter
before the furnishing of the transcript.
Sec. 16.3. NRS 5.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
5.015 1. If a municipal court has been designated as a court
of record pursuant to NRS 5.010, any proceeding before a jury in
the municipal court may be recorded by using sound recording
equipment.
2. Each municipal court judge may, with the approval of the
city council or other governing body of the city, appoint and fix
the compensation of a person, who need not be a certified court
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
reporter and may have other responsibilities in the court, to
operate the sound recording equipment. The person so appointed
shall subscribe to an oath that the person will so operate it as to
record all of the proceedings.
3. The municipal court judge may designate the same or
another person to transcribe the recording into a written
transcript. The person so designated shall subscribe to an oath
that the person has correctly transcribed it. The transcript may be
used for all purposes for which transcripts are used and is subject
to correction in the same manner as other transcripts.
Secs. 16.7 and 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17.5. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of this
act, the fees set forth in NRS 656.220, as that section existed on
December 31, 2025, remain in effect until the regulations
establishing fees pursuant to NRS 656.220, as amended by section
11.7 of this act, are adopted by the Certified Court Reporters’ Board
of Nevada and filed with the Secretary of State.
Sec. 18. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 17.5, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)